Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-6-501.7 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section:
1. "Biosolids" means primarily organically treated wastewater
materials from municipal wastewater treatment plants that are
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3411 Page 1

suit able for recycling as amendments. This term is within the
meaning of "sludge" referenced in Section 2-6-101 of this title.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to septage or
sewage that is removed from residential septic tanks; and
2. "PFAS" means per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, including
but not limited to PFOA, PFOS, and any additional compounds
designated by the Department of Environmental Quality.
B. The Department of Environmental Quality shall purchase the
necessary equipment to test for PFAS in biosolids.
C. To protect the health and safety of the people of this
state, prior to land application of biosolids, a sample of the
biosolids that are to be applied must first be tested by the
Department of Environmental Quality or by a laboratory appropriately
accredited to perform such an analysis in order to determine the
amount of PFAS in the biosolids prior to land application.
D. All farmers and ranchers whose lands are being applied with
biosolids shall be given test results that include nitrogen,
phosphorus, potassium, pH, PFAS, and heavy metal concentrations by
the person or entity providing such biosolids. The Department of
Environmental Quality shall help identify known potential risks, if
any, that must be disclosed. If risks are identified, those risks
shall be provided with the test results from the person or entity
providing biosolids.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3411 Page 2

E. Biosolids may not be applied to land where crops are grown
for human consumption. Furthermore, biosolids may not be applied in
the same place more than once every other year.
F. The Department of Environmental Quality shall propose rules
necessary to implement this section, which shall include an approval
process for alternative treatment methods such as microbial and
supercritical water oxidation methods to reduce or remove PFAS from
biosolids.
G. The Department of Environmental Quality shall implement the
requirements of this section no later than January 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate





ENGR. H. B. NO. 3411 Page 3